Florida, session 2026, SB516.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 20 21 Section 1.âParagraph (o) of subsection (2) and paragraph 22 (b) of subsection (3) of section 39.521, Florida Statutes, are 23 amended to read: 24 39.521âDisposition hearings; powers of disposition.â 25 (2)âThe family functioning assessment must provide the 26 court with the following documented information: 27 (o)âIf the child has been removed from the home and will be 28 remaining with a relative, parent, or other adult approved by 29 the court, a home study report concerning the proposed placement 30 shall be provided to the court. Before recommending to the court 31 any out-of-home placement for a child other than placement in a 32 licensed shelter or foster home, the department shall conduct a 33 study of the home of the proposed legal custodians, which must 34 include, at a minimum: 35 1.âAn interview with the proposed legal custodians to 36 assess their ongoing commitment and ability to care for the 37 child. 38 2.âRecords checks through the State Automated Child Welfare 39 Information System (SACWIS), and local and statewide criminal 40 and juvenile records checks through the Department of Law 41 Enforcement, on all household members 12 years of age or older. 42 In addition, the fingerprints of any household members who are 43 18 years of age or older may be submitted to the Department of 44 Law Enforcement for processing and forwarding to the Federal 45 Bureau of Investigation for state and national criminal history 46 information. The department has the discretion to request State 47 Automated Child Welfare Information System (SACWIS) and local, 48 statewide, and national criminal history checks and 49 fingerprinting of any other visitor to the home who is made 50 known to the department. Out-of-state criminal records checks 51 must be initiated for any individual who has resided in a state 52 other than Florida if that stateâs laws allow the release of 53 these records. The out-of-state criminal records must be filed 54 with the court within 5 days after receipt by the department or 55 its agent. 56 3.âAn assessment of the physical environment of the home. 57 4.âA determination of the financial security of the 58 proposed legal custodians. 59 5.âA determination of suitable child care arrangements if 60 the proposed legal custodians are employed outside of the home. 61 6.âDocumentation of counseling and information provided to 62 the proposed legal custodians regarding the dependency process 63 and possible outcomes. 64 7.âDocumentation that information regarding support 65 services available in the community has been provided to the 66 proposed legal custodians. 67 8.âThe reasonable preference of the child, if the court 68 deems the child to be of sufficient intelligence, understanding, 69 and experience to express a preference. 70 71 The department may not place the child or continue the placement 72 of the child in a home under shelter or postdisposition 73 placement if the results of the home study are unfavorable, 74 unless the court finds that this placement is in the childâs 75 best interest. The results of a home study may not be deemed 76 unfavorable solely due to the potential custodian temporarily 77 residing in a certified domestic violence center. A child may 78 not be removed from such placement due to the custodian and 79 child temporarily residing in a certified domestic violence 80 center instead of the physical environment that was assessed in 81 the home study if the custodian notifies the department within 82 24 hours after taking shelter in the domestic violence center 83 and the domestic violence center administration affirms in an 84 affidavit that the placement remains appropriate and protective. 85 86 Any other relevant and material evidence, including other 87 written or oral reports, may be received by the court in its 88 effort to determine the action to be taken with regard to the 89 child and may be relied upon to the extent of its probative 90 value, even though not competent in an adjudicatory hearing. 91 Except as otherwise specifically provided, nothing in this 92 section prohibits the publication of proceedings in a hearing. 93 (3)âWhen any child is adjudicated by a court to be 94 dependent, the court shall determine the appropriate placement 95 for the child as follows: 96 (b)âIf there is a parent with whom the child was not 97 residing at the time the events or conditions arose that brought 98 the child within the jurisdiction of the court who desires to 99 assume custody of the child, the court shall place the child 100 with that parent upon completion of a home study, unless the 101 court finds that such placement would endanger the safety, well 102 being, or physical, mental, or emotional health of the child. 103 The court may not find that such placement would endanger the 104 safety, well-being, or physical, mental, or emotional health of 105 the child solely due to the parent temporarily residing in a 106 certified domestic violence center. Any party with knowledge of 107 the facts may present to the court evidence regarding whether 108 the placement will endanger the safety, well-being, or physical, 109 mental, or emotional health of the child. 110 1.âIf the court places the child with such parent, it may 111 do either of the following: 112 a.1.âOrder that the parent assume sole custodial 113 responsibilities for the child. The court may also provide for 114 reasonable visitation by the noncustodial parent. The court may 115 then terminate its jurisdiction over the child. 116 b.2.âOrder that the parent assume custody subject to the 117 jurisdiction of the circuit court hearing dependency matters. 118 The court may order that reunification services be provided to 119 the parent from whom the child has been removed, that services 120 be provided solely to the parent who is assuming physical 121 custody in order to allow that parent to retain later custody 122 without court jurisdiction, or that services be provided to both 123 parents, in which case the court shall determine at every review 124 hearing which parent, if either, shall have custody of the 125 child. The standard for changing custody of the child from one 126 parent to another or to a relative or another adult approved by 127 the court shall be the best interest of the child. 128 2.âThe court may not remove the child from placement with 129 the parent due to the parent and the child temporarily residing 130 in a certified domestic violence center instead of the physical 131 environment that was assessed in the home study if the parent 132 notifies the department within 24 hours after taking shelter in 133 the domestic violence center and the domestic violence center 134 administration affirms in an affidavit that the placement 135 remains appropriate and protective. 136 137 Protective supervision continues until the court terminates it 138 or until the child reaches the age of 18, whichever date is 139 first. Protective supervision shall be terminated by the court 140 whenever the court determines that permanency has been achieved 141 for the child, whether with a parent, another relative, or a 142 legal custodian, and that protective supervision is no longer 143 needed. The termination of supervision may be with or without 144 retaining jurisdiction, at the courtâs discretion, and shall in 145 either case be considered a permanency option for the child. The 146 order terminating supervision by the department shall set forth 147 the powers of the custodian of the child and shall include the 148 powers ordinarily granted to a guardian of the person of a minor 149 unless otherwise specified. Upon the courtâs termination of 150 supervision by the department, no further judicial reviews are 151 required, so long as permanency has been established for the 152 child. 153 Section 2.âParagraph (b) of subsection (3) of section 154 39.522, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 155 39.522âPostdisposition change of custody.â 156 (3) 157 (b)1.âIn a hearing on the change of physical custody under 158 this section, there shall be a rebuttable presumption that it is 159 in the childâs best interest to remain permanently in his or her 160 current physical placement if: 161 a.âThe child has been in the same safe and stable placement 162 for 9 consecutive months or more; 163 b.âReunification is not a permanency option for the child; 164 c.âThe caregiver is able, willing, and eligible for 165 consideration as an adoptive parent or permanent custodian for 166 the child; 167 d.âThe caregiver is not requesting the change in physical 168 placement; and 169 e.âThe change in physical placement being sought is not to 170 reunify the child with his or her parent or sibling or 171 transition the child from a safe and stable nonrelative 172 caregiver to a safe and stable relative caregiver. 173 2.âIn order to rebut the presumption established in this 174 paragraph, the court shall hold an evidentiary hearing on the 175 change in physical custody to determine if the change in 176 placement is in the best interest of the child. As part of the 177 evidentiary hearing, the court must consider competent and 178 substantial evidence and testimony related to the factors 179 enumerated in s. 39.01375 and any other evidence deemed relevant 180 to a determination of placement, including evidence from a 181 court-selected neutral and independent licensed professional 182 with expertise in the science and research of child-parent 183 bonding. 184 3.âThis presumption may not be rebutted solely by the 185 expressed wishes of a biological parent, a biological relative, 186 or a caregiver of a sibling of the child. 187 4.âA child temporarily residing with his or her caregiver 188 in a certified domestic violence center does not rebut the 189 presumption established in this paragraph if the caregiver 190 notifies the department within 24 hours after taking shelter in 191 the domestic violence center and the domestic violence center 192 administration affirms in an affidavit that the placement 193 remains appropriate and protective. 194 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.